Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 6. Wildlife/Livestock Disease Research Partnership

§ 11-19-601.
Findings; purposes.

The interaction of livestock and wildlife may lead to mutual or shared diseases. Some of these diseases may have the potential to adversely affect Wyoming’s livestock producers and influence the management of Wyoming’s free-ranging wildlife. Research into these diseases may provide strategies or solutions that benefit Wyoming’s livestock industries and wildlife resources.

The purpose of the Wyoming wildlife/livestock disease research partnership is to utilize existing personnel and facilities of the state, to identify funding sources, to enhance wildlife and livestock disease research in the state, and to understand, manage, control and preempt potentially mutual or shared diseases that may impact wildlife, livestock or humans.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 179, § 1.

§ 11-19-602.
Wyoming wildlife/livestock disease research partnership board created;
membership; duties; purposes.

There is created the wildlife/livestock disease research partnership board within the department. The board shall consist of the following members or their designees:

The director of the department;

The director of the Wyoming game and fish department;

The vice-president for research at the University of Wyoming;

The director of the Wyoming state veterinary laboratory; and

The state veterinarian.

The board shall:

Accept funding from all sources, including federal, state and local governments and private donations to carry out the purposes of this article;

Leverage funds received to match other funds that may be available to the board;

Deposit funds received into the account created by W.S.

11-19-603

. No funds may be withdrawn or otherwise expended without the specific consent of at least three (3) members of the board;

Accept, review and prioritize research proposals submitted to the board;

Seek support for programs and projects consistent with the purposes of the board;

Allocate funds for research which serve the goals of understanding, managing, controlling or preempting potentially mutual or shared diseases that impact wild and domestic animals or humans in the state.

In approving research requests for funding, the board shall first consider any requests for funding from the Wyoming game and fish department, the University of Wyoming, the Wyoming department of agriculture and the Wyoming livestock board. After consideration of requests from those state agencies, the board may consider requests from other entities.

All research projects requesting funding from the board shall be submitted to the board in a form and manner specified by the board. The approval of not less than three (3) members of the board shall be required prior to funding of a project with funds received under this section.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 179, § 1.

§ 11-19-603.
Account created.

There is created a wildlife/livestock disease research partnership account. Funds from this account shall be used only for purposes specified in W.S.

11-19-601

through

11-19-604

. Any interest earned on the account shall remain within the account.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 179, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2015 ch. 141, § 2, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the special revenue fund” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

11-19-601

through

11-19-604

” for “W.S.

11-19-602

.”

Laws 2015, ch. 141, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides:

“The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2011, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2, provides:

Section 1. “There is appropriated one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000.00) from the general fund to the wildlife/livestock disease research partnership account created by W.S.

11-19-603

.
This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purposes provided in W.S.

11-19-602

for nonbrucellosis related research.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall not revert until further action of the legislature.”

Section 2. “This act is effective July 1, 2011.”

§ 11-19-604.
Wyoming bighorn/domestic sheep plan.

The Wyoming bighorn/domestic sheep plan shall be developed and maintained by rule and regulation as provided in this section to address potential conflicts arising out of the interaction between bighorn sheep and domestic sheep within the state. The final report and recommendations from the Wyoming state-wide bighorn/domestic sheep interaction working group dated September 2004 together with appendices A through N as adopted by the group is adopted as the initial Wyoming bighorn/domestic sheep plan under this section and shall continue as revised or amended until repealed or nullified pursuant to law.

Rules and regulations necessary to administer this article shall be promulgated jointly by the game and fish commission, the board of agriculture and the livestock board. The game and fish commission, the board of agriculture and the livestock board may jointly consider recommendations for changes to the plan and may revise or amend the plan through the rulemaking process pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The goal of the Wyoming bighorn/domestic sheep plan shall be to maintain the health of bighorn sheep populations while sustaining an economically viable domestic sheep population.

The most current version of the Wyoming bighorn/domestic sheep plan shall be published on the website of the game and fish commission.

In conformance with the Wyoming bighorn/domestic sheep plan the game and fish department may relocate or remove bighorn sheep to another area of the state if a federal judicial action or agency decision would require elimination of domestic sheep grazing in any area or herd unit designated in the Wyoming bighorn/domestic sheep plan as a nonemphasis herd. The game and fish department shall be reimbursed for the costs of relocation or removal of sheep under this subsection from funds available in the wildlife/livestock disease research partnership account.

History.

2015 ch. 141, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2015, ch. 141, § 1 makes the act effective March 4, 2015.